Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-817
Ordinances to enforce collection of taxes; power.

The mayor and city council of a city of the primary class shall have full power and authority to pass ordinances not inconsistent with the laws of this state which they may deem necessary to secure a speedy and thorough collection of all municipal taxes and special assessments.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 87, p. 102;

R.S.1913, § 4561;

C.S.1922, § 3948;

C.S.1929, § 15-819;

R.S.1943, § 15-817;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 139.